Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8101
Act, how cited.

Sections
44-8101 to 44-8109 shall be known and
may be cited as the Nebraska Protection in Annuity Transactions Act.

Laws 2006, LB 875, § 13;

Laws 2007, LB117, § 26;

Laws 2012, LB887, § 21.